Illinois, session 104th, SB3607.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Fair 5Contracting for Health Care Practitioners Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Employer" means a person or group of persons that employ 8a health care practitioner at a health care facility. 9    "Health care facility" means the office, facility, or 10location where a majority of the revenue derived from a health 11care practitioner's services is generated. 12    "Health care professional" means a physician licensed to 13practice medicine in all its branches under the Medical 14Practice Act of 1987, an advanced practice registered nurse or 15certified registered nurse anesthetist licensed under the 16Nurse Practice Act, or a physician assistant licensed under 17the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987.18    "Covenant not to compete" means an agreement that is 19entered into between an employer and a health care 20practitioner in this State that has the effect of impeding the 21ability of the health care practitioner to continue treating 22patients or accepting new patients, either practicing 23independently or in the employment of a competing employer   SB3607- 2 -LRB104 18022 SPS 31461 b1after the term of employment is concluded. 2    "Patient" means an individual to whom a health care 3practitioner has rendered professional services within the 4practitioner's scope of practice for which compensation has 5been received by the health care practitioner, regardless of 6the source of the compensation. 7    Section 10. Covenants not to compete for health care 8practitioners. 9    (a) Except as provided under subsection (b), a covenant 10not to compete entered into on or after the effective date of 11this Act is deemed contrary to the public policy and is void 12and unenforceable by an employer. 13    (b) An employer may enforce a covenant not to compete if 14the length of the covenant not to compete is no more than one 15year, provided that the health care practitioner was not 16dismissed by the employer. 17    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to: 18        (1) prohibit the enforcement of a contract provision 19    that allows an employer to recover reasonable expenses 20    from a health care practitioner, if the expenses are: 21            (A) directly attributable to the health care 22        practitioner and accrued within the 3 years prior to 23        separation, unless separation is caused by the 24        dismissal of the health care practitioner; 25            (B) related to relocation, training, and   SB3607- 3 -LRB104 18022 SPS 31461 b1        establishment of a patient base; or 2            (C) amortized over a period of up to 5 years from 3        the date of separation by the health care 4        practitioner; or 5        (2) void or render a covenant not to compete entered 6    into with a health care practitioner with an interest in a 7    business entity unenforceable as a direct result of: 8            (A) the sale of an ownership interest in all or 9        substantially all of the assets of the business 10        entity; 11            (B) a transaction resulting in the sale, transfer, 12        or other disposition of control of the business 13        entity, including by merger or consolidation; or 14            (C) the health care practitioner's receipt, by 15        purchase, grant, award, issuance, or otherwise of an 16        ownership interest in the business entity. 17    For purposes of this subsection, "control" means the 18possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct the 19management and policies of a business entity, whether through 20the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise. 21    (d) A preexisting covenant not to compete may be rendered 22void and unenforceable under this Section if a health care 23practitioner is not a party to the sale, transfer, or other 24disposition of a business entity as described in subparagraph 25(A) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c). 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January   SB3607- 4 -LRB104 18022 SPS 31461 b11, 2027.